test/src/morphology/myv-tests-adj.yaml
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашошканксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашосоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксентеньгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостонокседентькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксесэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксестэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксевтементькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксешкантькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксексэнтькак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнененьгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнедеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнесэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнестэяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнескак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Lat+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневгак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abe+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетневтемеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетнешкаяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com+Def+Clt/Гак: ашостоноксетненеккак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованкседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованкседеяк
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+Indef+Clt/Гак: ашованксекскак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашованксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Гак: ашованксеськак
     ашо+A+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Px1Pl+Der/Dem+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Гак: ашованксентькак
